Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 1
UNIFORM MARRIAGE ACT

Editor's note:

(1) This part 1 was numbered as article 1 of chapter 90, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this part 1 were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 1 prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) In In re Hogsett, 2021 CO 1, 478 P.3d 713, the Colorado supreme court held that a common law marriage may be established by the mutual consent or agreement of the couple to enter the legal and social institution of marriage, followed by conduct manifesting that mutual agreement.

Annotator's note.

For the test for proving a common law marriage, see In re Hogsett, 2021 CO 1, 478 P.3d 713.

14-2-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Marriage Act".

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-1.

14-2-102. Purposes - rules of construction.

This part 1 shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes.

Its underlying purposes are:

To strengthen and preserve the integrity of marriage and to safeguard meaningful family relationships;

To provide adequate procedures for the solemnization and registration of marriage.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-2.

14-2-103. Uniformity of application and construction.

This part 1 shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this part 1 among those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-3.

14-2-104. Formalities.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a marriage is valid in this state if:

It is licensed, solemnized, and registered as provided in this part 1; and

It is only between one man and one woman.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14-2-112, any marriage contracted within or outside this state that does not satisfy paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall not be recognized as valid in this state.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to repeal or render invalid any otherwise valid common law marriage between one man and one woman:

Entered into prior to September 1, 2006; or

Entered into on or after September 1, 2006, that complies with section 14-2-109.5.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-4.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1054, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2006, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(3) amended, p. 9, § 1, effective July 18.

Cross references:

For the validity or recognition of marriages in this state, see section 31 of article II of the state constitution; for cases construing constitutional and statutory provisions similar to section 31 of article II of the state constitution, see the editor's note under section 31 of article II.

14-2-105. Marriage license and marriage certificate.

The executive director of the department of public health and environment shall prescribe the form for an application for a marriage license, which must include the following information:

Name, sex, address, last four digits of the social security number, and date and place of birth of each party to the proposed marriage, which proof of identity and date of birth may be by a birth certificate, a driver's license, a passport, or other comparable evidence;

If either party has previously been married, such party's married name and the date, place, and court in which the marriage was dissolved or declared invalid or the date and place of death of the former spouse;

If either party has previously been a partner in a civil union and, if so, the name of the other partner in the civil union, or the date, place, and court in which the civil union was dissolved or declared invalid, or the date and place of death of the former partner in the civil union;

Name and address of the parents or guardian of each party;

Whether the parties are related to each other and, if so, their relationship, or, if the parties are currently married to each other, a statement to that effect.

The executive director of the department of public health and environment shall prescribe the forms for the marriage license, the marriage certificate, and the consent to marriage.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-5.

L. 93:

(1)(b) and (1)(d) amended, p. 437, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 2731, § 347, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

IP(1) amended and (1)(b.5) added, (SB 16-150), ch. 263, p. 1080, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1316), ch. 380, p. 3421, § 5, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 16-150, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

14-2-106. License to marry.

When a marriage license application has been completed and signed by both parties to a prospective marriage and at least one party has appeared before the county clerk and recorder and has paid the marriage license fee of seven dollars, a fee of twenty dollars to be transmitted by the county clerk and recorder to the state treasurer and credited by the treasurer to the Colorado domestic abuse program fund created in section 39-22-802 (1), and an additional amount established pursuant to section 25-2-121, such amount to be credited to the vital statistics records cash fund pursuant to section 25-2-121, the county clerk shall issue a license to marry and a marriage certificate form upon being furnished:

Satisfactory proof that each party to the marriage will have attained the age of eighteen years at the time the marriage license becomes effective; or, if over the age of sixteen years but has not attained the age of eighteen years, has judicial approval, as provided in section 14-2-108; and

Satisfactory proof that the marriage is not prohibited, as provided in section 14-2-110.

Violation of subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section makes the marriage voidable.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1017, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-6.

L. 75:

(2)(a) amended, p. 583, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 79:

(2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(d) R&RE, p. 635, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(a)(III) amended, p. 1118, § 9, effective June 7; IP(1)(a) amended, p. 742, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a)(III) amended, p. 711, § 1, effective July 1; (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(d), (2)(f), and (2)(g) amended and (2)(h) added, p. 711, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

IP(1)(a) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 936, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(c) amended, p. 927, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 98:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1394, § 30, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2000:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 1571, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1)(a) amended, (SB 09-068), ch. 264, p. 1211, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1316), ch. 380, p. 3419, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(h) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective July 1, 1989. (See L. 86, p. 711.)

14-2-106.5. License to marry without appearing in person - repeal.

Notwithstanding section 14-2-106 to the contrary, a county clerk and recorder may permit the parties to a prospective marriage to satisfy the requirement to appear before the county clerk and recorder by an interactive audiovisual communication technology or online functionality, for the following limited purposes:

To verify application information;

To present satisfactory proof that each party to the marriage will have attained the age of eighteen years at the time the marriage license becomes effective;

To present satisfactory proof that the marriage is not prohibited; or

To pay required fees.

A county clerk and recorder shall not permit the procedure described in subsection (1) of this section if either of the parties are under eighteen years of age, or if the parties are using interactive audiovisual technology and are unable to appear together. Nothing in this section changes any requirement that must be satisfied in the state of Colorado.

A county clerk and recorder who permits the parties to a prospective marriage to satisfy certain requirements without appearing in person and staff members who carry out duties on behalf of the county clerk and recorder pursuant to this section shall complete the training and curricula developed by the human trafficking council created in section 18-3-505 for persons who work in or who frequent places where human trafficking victims are likely to appear. The training and curricula must be completed prior to permitting parties to a prospective marriage to satisfy certain requirements without appearing in person pursuant to this section; except that if a county clerk and recorder permits the parties to a prospective marriage to satisfy certain requirements without appearing in person on and before June 18, 2021, the training and curricula must be completed no later than thirty days after June 18, 2021. A county clerk and recorder who permits the parties to a prospective marriage to satisfy certain requirements without appearing in person shall maintain records demonstrating compliance with this subsection (3) and shall display a notice of compliance with this subsection (3) in a place that is accessible to the public in the county clerk and recorder's office and on its website.

This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1287), ch. 264, p. 1537, § 1, effective June 18.

14-2-107. When licenses to marry issued - validity.

Licenses to marry shall be issued by the county clerk and recorder only during the hours that the office of the county clerk and recorder is open as prescribed by law and at no other time, and such licenses shall show the exact date and hour of their issue. A license shall not be valid for use outside the state of Colorado. Within the state, such licenses shall not be valid for more than thirty-five days after the date of issue. If any license to marry is not used within thirty-five days, it is void and shall be returned to the county clerk and recorder for cancellation.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-7.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 583, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 437, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 829, § 22, effective July 1.

14-2-108. Judicial approval.

The juvenile court, as defined in section 19-1-103, after a reasonable effort has been made to notify the parents or legal guardians of each underage party, may order the county clerk and recorder pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to issue a marriage license and a marriage certificate form to a person sixteen or seventeen years of age.

The court may order the county clerk and recorder to issue a marriage license under subsection (1) of this section only if the court finds, after reviewing the report of the guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section, that the underage party is capable of assuming the responsibilities of marriage and the marriage would serve the underage party's best interests. Pregnancy alone does not establish that the best interests of the party would be served.

Prior to ordering the issuance of a marriage license to an underage party, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the underage party and direct the guardian ad litem to investigate the best interests of the underage party and to file a report with the court addressing the factors set forth in subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section and stating a position as to whether the issuance of a marriage license to the underage party is in the underage party's best interests.

The court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

The wishes of the underage party;

The view of the parents or legal guardians of the underage party, if known;

The ability of the underage party to assume the responsibilities of marriage;

The circumstances surrounding the marriage; and

The ability of the underage party to manage the underage party's financial, personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs independent of the underage party's intended spouse both during the marriage or upon dissolution of the marriage.

The district court or the juvenile court, as the case may be, shall authorize performance of a marriage by proxy upon the showing required by the provisions on solemnization, being section 14-2-109.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-8.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, p. 815, § 15, effective October 1.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1394, § 31, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 19-1316), ch. 380, p. 3420, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 712, § 18, effective October 1.

14-2-109. Solemnization and registration of marriages - proxy marriage.

A marriage may be solemnized by a judge of a court, by a court magistrate, by a retired judge of a court, by a public official whose powers include solemnization of marriages, by the parties to the marriage, or in accordance with any mode of solemnization recognized by any religious denomination or Indian nation or tribe. Either the person solemnizing the marriage or, if no individual acting alone solemnized the marriage, a party to the marriage shall complete the marriage certificate form and forward it to the county clerk and recorder within sixty-three days after the solemnization. Any person who fails to forward the marriage certificate to the county clerk and recorder as required by this section shall be required to pay a late fee in an amount of not less than twenty dollars. An additional five-dollar late fee may be assessed for each additional day of failure to comply with the forwarding requirements of this subsection (1) up to a maximum of fifty dollars. For purposes of determining whether a late fee shall be assessed pursuant to this subsection (1), the date of forwarding shall be deemed to be the date of postmark.

The requirements for applying for a marriage license for a proxy marriage are the following:

One party to the proxy marriage is a resident of the state of Colorado;

One party to the proxy marriage appears in person to apply for the marriage license and pays the fees required in section 14-2-106 (1);

The signatures of both parties to the proxy marriage are required, and the party present shall sign the marriage license application, as prescribed in section 14-2-105 (2), and provide an absentee affidavit form, as prescribed by the state registrar, containing the notarized signature of the absent party, along with proper identification documents as specified in section 14-2-105 (1)(a) for the absent party; and

Both parties to the proxy marriage are eighteen years of age or older.

If a party to a marriage is unable to be present at the solemnization, the absent party may authorize in writing a third person to act as the absent party's proxy for purposes of solemnization of the marriage, if the absent party is:

A member of the armed forces of the United States who is stationed in another country or in another state in support of combat or another military operation; or

An individual who is a government contractor, or an employee of a government contractor, working in support of the armed forces of the United States or in support of United States military operations in another country or in another state and who supplies proper identification of that status.

If the person solemnizing the marriage is satisfied that the absent party is unable to be present and has consented to the marriage, such person may solemnize the marriage by proxy. If such person is not satisfied, the parties may petition the district court for an order permitting the marriage to be solemnized by proxy.

Upon receipt of the marriage certificate, the county clerk and recorder shall register the marriage.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1019, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-9.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 637, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 781, § 1, effective April 4.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 359, § 19, effective April 9.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 438, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 829, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2) amended, (HB 15-1327), ch. 229, p. 851, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2019:

(2)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 19-1316), ch. 380, p. 3421, § 3, effective August 2.

14-2-109.3. Rights of underage married persons.

In addition to any rights established in law, a married person who has not attained eighteen years of age has the following rights:

The right to establish a domicile separate from the married person's parents;

The right to file motions and petitions with a court in the married person's name and on the married person's own behalf;

The right to enter into enforceable contracts, including but not limited to leases for housing; and

The right to consent to and make decisions concerning the married person's own medical care.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1316), ch. 380, p. 3421, § 4, effective August 2.

14-2-109.5. Common law marriage - age restrictions.

A common law marriage entered into on or after September 1, 2006, shall not be recognized as a valid marriage in this state unless, at the time the common law marriage is entered into:

Each party is eighteen years of age or older; and

The marriage is not prohibited, as provided in section 14-2-110.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14-2-112, a common law marriage contracted within or outside this state on or after September 1, 2006, that does not satisfy the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not be recognized as valid in this state.

Source:

L. 2006, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 9, § 2, effective July 18.

14-2-110. Prohibited marriages.

The following marriages are prohibited:

A marriage entered into prior to the dissolution of an earlier marriage of one of the parties, except a currently valid marriage between the parties;

A marriage entered into prior to the dissolution of an earlier civil union of one of the parties, except a currently valid civil union between the same two parties;

A marriage between an ancestor and a descendant or between a brother and a sister, whether the relationship is by the half or the whole blood;

A marriage between an uncle and a niece or between an aunt and a nephew, whether the relationship is by the half or the whole blood, except as to marriages permitted by the established customs of aboriginal cultures.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1019, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-10.

L. 78:

(1)(b) amended, p. 262, § 47, effective May 23.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 438, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1)(a.5) added, (SB 16-150), ch. 263, p. 1080, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 2018:

(2) repealed, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 753, § 5, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For criminal penalties for the offense of bigamy, see § 18-6-201; for criminal penalties for the offense of incest, see § 18-6-301.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 16-150, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2016. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-2-111. Putative spouse.

A person who has cohabited with another to whom he or she is not legally married in the good faith belief that he or she was married to that person is a putative spouse until knowledge of the fact that he or she is not legally married terminates his or her status and prevents acquisition of further rights. A putative spouse acquires the rights conferred upon a legal spouse, including the right to maintenance following termination of his or her status, whether or not the marriage is prohibited under section 14-2-110, declared invalid, or otherwise terminated by court action. If there is a legal spouse or other putative spouses, rights acquired by a putative spouse do not supersede the rights of the legal spouse or those acquired by other putative spouses, but the court shall apportion property, maintenance, and support rights among the claimants as appropriate in the circumstances and in the interests of justice.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1019, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-11.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 753, § 6, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-2-112. Application.

All marriages contracted within this state prior to January 1, 1974, or outside this state that were valid at the time of the contract or subsequently validated by the laws of the place in which they were contracted or by the domicile of the parties are valid in this state.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1020, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-12.

14-2-113. Violation - penalty.

Except as provided in section 14-2-109 (1), any person who knowingly violates any provision of this part 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1020, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-1-13.